Connecticut, session 2026, HB05550.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Subsection (b) of section 1-210 of the 2026 supplement to
2 the general statutes is amended by adding subdivision (29) as follows
3 (Effective October 1, 2026):
4 (NEW) (29) Records created by or for the faculty or staff of a public
5 institution of higher education that consist of course syllabi.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 1-210(b)(29)
GAE Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 1 of 1